Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4366.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 13c. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 324 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 324.3115(2) Pub saf H Water pollution 2 324.3115(4) 324.3115(5) Pub saf G Water pollution ? substantial endangerment 5 324.5531(4) Pub saf H Knowingly releasing air pollutants 2 324.5531(5) Pub saf G Knowingly releasing air pollutants ? causing death or serious bodily injury 6 324.5531(6) Pub saf C Knowingly releasing air pollutants ? intentionally causing death or serious bodily injury 15 324.8905(2) Pub saf H Littering ? infectious waste/pathological waste/sharps 2 324.8905(3) Pub saf G Littering ? infectious waste/pathological waste/sharps ? subsequent offense 5 324.11151(2) Pub saf H Hazardous waste ? subsequent offense 2 324.11151(3) Pub saf H Hazardous waste ? disregard for human life 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 324.11151(3) Pub saf G Hazardous waste ? extreme indifference for human life 5 324.11549(2) Pub saf G Solid waste ? importing from foreign country 2 324.11719(2) Pub saf G Septage ? false statement or entry in a license application or record 2 324.12116(2) Pub saf H Liquid industrial by-product ? false statement in an application or shipping document 2 324.20139(3) Pub saf H Hazardous substance ? knowing release or intentional false statement 2 324.20139(4) Pub saf E Hazardous substance ? substantial endangerment 5 324.21324(1) Pub saf G Underground storage tanks ? false or misleading information 5 324.21548(1) Pub trst H Underground storage tanks ? false or misleading request for payment 5 1 2 3 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H00125'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.